Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,174
Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person using a motor vehicle or trailer registered as well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment for any purpose other than that for which the special equipment license plate was issued shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and shall be required to register such motor vehicle or trailer as a commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer for the entire year in which the violation occurred.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 174.